Maine, session 132, LD849.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §1005 is enacted to read:
§1005. Recall of school board members
1. Grounds for recall. Notwithstanding any provision of law, ordinance or municipal
charter to the contrary, a school board member may not be recalled unless the school board
member:
A. Has been convicted of a crime punishable under the laws of this State or another
jurisdiction by imprisonment for a term of one year or longer, the conduct of which
occurred during the school board member's term of office;
B. Has failed to perform duties prescribed by law; or
C. Has willfully misused, converted or misappropriated, without legal authority, public
property or public funds.
A school board member's performance of a required duty or a discretionary duty is not a
ground for recall.
2. Petition for recall. A written petition to recall a school board member must be
signed:
A. If the school board member was elected by the voters of a municipality, by a number
of voters equal to at least 25% of the number of voters in that municipality who voted
in the last gubernatorial election; or
B. If the school board member was elected as a school board member-at-large in a
school administrative unit, by a number of voters equal to at least 25% of the number
of voters in the school administrative unit who voted in the last gubernatorial election.
3. Notice of intention. In order to initiate a recall election under subsection 2, the
initiator of the petition shall file a notice of intention of recall with the municipal clerk of
the municipality in which the school board member was elected or with each municipal
clerk of all municipalities in a school administrative unit, if the school board member was
elected at large. A notice of intention of recall under this subsection must include the name,
address and contact information of the person filing the notice, the name of the school board
member subject to recall under this section and the reason for the recall initiative, which
must comply with subsection 1. Only a person registered to vote in the municipality in
which the school board member was elected, or in a municipality in the school
administrative unit if the school board member was elected at large, may file a notice of
intention of recall under this subsection.
4. Petition forms. Within 3 business days of receipt of a notice of intention of recall
under subsection 3, the municipal clerk shall prepare petition forms for the collection of
signatures under subsection 5 and send notice to the initiator of the petition under
subsection 3 that the petition forms are available. If the school board member was elected
at large, the municipalities shall coordinate in preparing and providing the petition forms
and sending notice and shall designate one municipal clerk to handle the submission of
signatures under subsection 5. A municipality may charge the initiator of the petition a
reasonable fee for preparing and providing the petition forms under this subsection. A
petition form under this subsection must include:
Page 1 - 132LR1871(01)

A. At the top of the form, the name of the school board member subject to recall, the
name and contact information of the initiator of the petition and the date by which the
signatures must be submitted to the municipal clerk under subsection 5;
B. The reason for the recall initiative;
C. Spaces for each voter's signature, street address and printed name; and
D. Space at the bottom of the form for the name, address and signature of the person
circulating the petition form.
5. Collection and submission of signatures. A petition form under subsection 4 may
be circulated or signed only by registered voters of the municipality in which the school
member was elected, or of a municipality within the school administrative unit if the school
board member was elected at large. A circulator of a petition form shall oversee the
collection of signatures and ensure that the information required under subsection 4,
paragraph C is accurate and complete. The initiator of the petition under subsection 3 shall
collect the petition forms from all circulators and submit the signed petition forms to the
municipal clerk who prepared the petition forms within 14 days of receipt of notice from
the municipal clerk that the petition forms are available under subsection 4. A municipal
clerk may not accept a petition form submitted more than 14 days after sending notice of
availability to the initiator under subsection 4, and any voter signatures on that petition
form are invalid.
6. Petition certification and notification. Within 7 business days of receiving
petition forms under subsection 5, the municipal clerk shall determine whether the petition
forms meet the criteria under subsection 5 and certify the validity of any signatures on the
petition forms. If the municipal clerk finds that the number of valid signatures submitted
under subsection 5 meets or exceeds the requirements under subsection 2, the municipal
clerk shall certify the petition and immediately send notification of the certification to the
appropriate municipal officers, the initiator of the petition and the school board member
subject to the recall. If the municipal clerk finds that the number of valid signatures
submitted under subsection 5 does not meet the requirements for a petition under subsection
2, the municipal clerk shall file the petition and the petition forms in the municipal clerk's
office and notify the initiator of the petition and, if the school board member was elected
at large, the clerks of the other municipalities within the school administrative unit that the
number of valid signatures does not meet the requirements for a petition under subsection
2.
7. Scheduling recall election. Within 21 business days of certification of the petition
under subsection 6, the municipal officers shall schedule a recall election to determine
whether the school board member subject to the petition should be recalled. The election
must be held no less than 45 days and no more than 75 days after certification of the petition
under subsection 6 unless a regular municipal election is scheduled to be held within 90
days of the certification of the petition under subsection 6, in which case the recall election
must be held on the date of the regular municipal election. If the municipal officers fail to
schedule a recall election within 21 business days of certification of the petition under
subsection 6, the municipal clerk shall schedule, or in the case of an at-large election, the
municipal clerks of the municipalities within the school administrative unit shall jointly
schedule the recall election in accordance with the requirements of this subsection.
Page 2 - 132LR1871(01)

8. Ballots for recall election. If the school board member subject to the recall does
not resign from the school board member's position within 21 business days of certification
of the petition under subsection 6, the ballots for the recall election under subsection 7 must
be printed. A ballot for a recall election under this section must read:
"Do you authorize the recall of (name of school board member) from the
(school administrative unit) school board?
Yes No"
9. Valid election. The recall must be approved by a majority of voters in an election
in which the total number of ballots is at least 35% of the number of votes cast in the
municipality in the last gubernatorial election or, if the school board member was elected
as a school board member-at-large, 35% of the number of votes cast in the school
administrative unit in the last gubernatorial election.
10. Results of recall election. Within 2 business days of a recall election under this
section, the municipal clerk, or, if the election was for a school board member-at-large, the
municipal clerks of each municipality within the school administrative unit, shall certify
and record the election results and notify the municipal officers of those results. If a
majority of voters vote to remove the school board member, the recall takes effect on the
date the election results are recorded pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §2505, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 324, §1, is amended
to read:
Except as otherwise provided by the municipality's ordinances or charter, an elected
official of a municipality may be recalled from office pursuant to this section. For purposes
of this section, "official" has the same meaning as in section 2604, subsection 2, except that
"official" does not include a member of a school board whose recall is governed by Title
20-A, section 1005.